Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1388XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1388XD (2) 91
jm/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 453C.1, subsection 10, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
10. “Units sold” means the number of individual cigarettes
sold in the state by the applicable tobacco product
manufacturer, whether directly or through a distributor,
retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries, during the
year in question, as measured by excise taxes collected by the
state on in packs bearing required to bear the excise stamp of
the state or on in the case of roll-your-own tobacco containers
on which a tax is due pursuant to chapter 453A. The department
of revenue shall adopt rules as are necessary to ascertain
the amount of state excise tax paid on the cigarettes of such
tobacco product manufacturer for each year.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate
importance, takes effect upon enactment.